Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7113
State correctional employees; services provided.

All services available and provided to emergency service personnel under the Critical Incident Stress Management Act shall also be available and provided to state correctional employees for incidents which occur in the course of their duties or at their worksite.

Laws 1997, LB 184, § 13.